ro-RO: Electronice > Audio > Echipamente pentru scenă: Sisteme de monitorizare de ureche; Scrimuri, fuste și fațade; Podele și platforme de scenă; Buzunare și cutii de podea pentru scenă; Monitoare de scenă; Cabluri multicore pentru scenă; Structuri și echipamente de rigare; Receptoare wireless; Transmițătoare wireless
ja: 電子機器 > オーディオ > ステージ機器: インイヤーモニターシステム; スクリム、スカート・ファサード; ステージデッキ・プラットフォーム; ステージフロアポケット・ボックス; ステージモニター; ステージスネーク; トラス・リギングハードウェア; ワイヤレスレシーバー; ワイヤレストランスミッター
cs: Elektronika > Zvuk > Pódiové vybavení: Systémy pro in-ear monitoring; Krycí stěny, závěsy a zástěny; Pódia a plošiny; Podlahové kapsy a boxy; Pódiové monitory; Pódiové multikabely; Prihrádkové konstrukce a závěsný hardware; Bezdrátové přijímače; Bezdrátové vysílače
pt-PT: Eletrónica > Áudio > Equipamento de palco: Sistemas de monitor in-ear; Cortinas, saias e fachadas para palco; Plataformas e estrados para palco; Caixas e tomadas de palco; Monitores de palco; Stage snakes; Estruturas treliçadas e ferragens de suspensão; Recetores sem fio; Transmissores sem fios
de: Elektronik > Audio > Bühnenausstattung: In-Ear-Monitorsysteme; Scrims, Bühnenröcke und Frontverkleidungen; Bühnenpodeste und -plattformen; Bodenanschlusskästen und -dosen; Bühnenmonitore; Multicore-Kabel (Stage Snakes); Traversen und Rigging-Hardware; Drahtlose Empfänger; Drahtlossender
th: อิเล็กทรอนิกส์ > เสียง > อุปกรณ์เวที: ระบบมอนิเตอร์อินเอียร์; ผ้าบัง ผ้ากั้น และหน้าบังเวที; แท่นและแพลตฟอร์มเวที; กล่องต่อสายและพ็อกเก็ตพื้นเวที; ลำโพงมอนิเตอร์เวที; สายสเนคเวที; โครงฟาร์มและอุปกรณ์แขวนเวที; เครื่องรับสัญญาณไร้สาย; เครื่องส่งสัญญาณวิทยุแบบไร้สาย
ru: Электроника > Аудиотехника > Сценическое оборудование: Системы персонального мониторинга; Задники, юбки и фасады для сцены; Сценические подиумы и платформы; Сценические напольные карманы и боксы; Сценические мониторы; Сценические мультикоры; Траверсы и такелажное оборудование; Беспроводные приемники; Беспроводные передатчики
hu: Elektronika > Hang > Színpadi berendezések: Fülmonitorrendszerek; Függönyök, szoknyák és homlokzatok; Színpadi fedélzetek és emelvények; Színpadi padlózsebek és dobozok; Színpadi monitorok; Színpadi snake-kábelek; Tartószerkezetek és kötélzeti szerelvények; Vezeték nélküli vevők; Vezeték nélküli adók
vi: Thiết bị điện tử > Âm thanh > Thiết bị sân khấu: Hệ thống giám sát trong tai; Màn và gian sân khấu; Bục và nền sân khấu; Hộp và túi sàn sân khấu; Loa giám sát sân khấu; Dây cáp sân khấu; Khung và phần cứng treo; Bộ thu không dây; Bộ nhận gửi tín hiệu không dây
el: Ηλεκτρονικά > Ήχος > Εξοπλισμός σκηνής: Συστήματα ενδοωτικών μόνιτορ; Παραπετάσματα, φούστες & προσόψεις; Πλατφόρμες & δάπεδα σκηνής; Κουτιά & υποδοχές δαπέδου σκηνής; Μόνιτορ σκηνής; Καλώδια πολλαπλών συνδέσεων σκηνής; Δικτυώματα & υλικό ανάρτησης; Ασύρματοι δέκτες; Ασύρματοι πομποί
tr: Elektronik > Ses > Sahne Ekipmanları: Kulak İçi Monitör Sistemleri; Perdeler, Etekler ve Cepheler; Sahne Güverteleri ve Platformları; Sahne Zemin Cepleri ve Kutuları; Sahne Monitörleri; Sahne Snake Kabloları; Kafes Sistemleri ve Askı Donanımları; Kablosuz Alıcılar; Kablosuz Vericiler
sl-SI: Elektronika > Avdio > Odrska oprema: Ušesni monitorski sistemi; Zavese, krila in fasade; Odri in platforme; Talne vtičnice in škatle za oder; Odrski monitorji; Odrski kabelski snopi; Nosilne konstrukcije in dvižna oprema; Brezžični sprejemniki; Brezžični oddajniki
zh-CN: 电子产品 > 音频 > 舞台设备: 入耳式监听系统; 舞台遮幕、裙边和装饰板; 舞台平台; 舞台地板插座和接线盒; 舞台监听音箱; 舞台蛇形线; 桁架和吊装设备; 无线接收器; 无线传输器
nl: Elektronica > Audio > Toneelapparatuur: In-ear monitorsystemen; Decor doeken, podiumrokken en façades; Podiumvloeren en platforms; Podiumvloer aansluitkasten en aansluitboxen; Podiummonitoren; Multikabels; Trussen en rigging hardware; Draadloze ontvangers; Draadloze zenders
lt-LT: Elektronika > Garsas > Scenos įranga: Ausinės stebėjimo sistemos; Scrims, skirts ir facades; Scenos ir platformos; Scenos angos ir dėžės; Scenos monitoriai; Scenos jungtuvai; Rėmai ir rigging įranga; Belaidžiai imtuvai; Belaidžiai siųstuvai
pt-BR: Eletrônicos > Áudio > Equipamento de palco: Sistemas de monitoramento in-ear; Scrims, saias e fachadas; Plataformas e decks de palco; Caixas e tomadas de piso de palco; Monitores de palco; Snakes de palco; Treliças e ferragens de rigging; Receptores sem fio; Transmissores sem fio
fr: Appareil électronique > Audio > Matériel de scène: Systèmes de retour intra-auriculaires; Toiles, jupes et façades de scène; Plateaux et podiums de scène; Boîtiers et prises encastrées de scène; Enceintes de retour de scène; Multipaires audio de scène; Structures aluminium et accessoires de levage; Récepteurs sans fil; Systèmes de transmission sans fil
nb: Elektronikk > Lyd > Sceneutstyr: In-ear-monitorsystemer; Scenetepper, sceneskjørt og -fasader; Sceneplattformer og -gulv; Scenelommer og -bokser; Scenemonitorer; Sceneslanger; Takstøtter og riggemaskinvare; Trådløse mottakere; Trådløse sendere
sk-SK: Elektronika > Zvukové zariadenia > Vybavenie javiska: Systémy ušných monitorov; Zásteny, sukne a fasády; Javiskové podlahové podlahy a platformy; Javiskové podlahové zásuvky a boxy; Javiskové monitory; Javiskové káblovody; Príhradové konštrukcie a žeriavový hardvér; Bezdrôtové prijímače; Bezdrôtové vysielače
pl: Elektronika > Audio > Sprzęt sceniczny: Systemy monitoringu douszne; Osłony, zasłony i fasady sceny; Platformy i podesty sceniczne; Wpusty podłogi sceny i skrzynie; Monitory sceniczne; Przewody sceniczne; Fermy i sprzęt wyciągowy; Odbiorniki bezprzewodowe; Transmitery bezprzewodowe
fi: Elektroniikka > Audio > Lavatarvikkeet: Korvansisäinen monitorointijärjestelmä; Peiteverhot, lavaliepeet ja etupaneelit; Lavakansi ja -lava; Lavan lattiakotelot ja -rasiat; Lavamonitori; Lavakaapeli; Trussit ja ripustustarvikkeet; Langattomat vastaanottimet; Langattomat lähettimet
ko: 전자기기 > 오디오 > 무대 장비: 인이어 모니터 시스템; 스크림, 스커트 및 파사드; 무대 데크 및 플랫폼; 무대 플로어 포켓 및 박스; 무대 모니터; 무대 스네이크; 트러스 및 리깅 하드웨어; 무선 수신기; 무선 송신기
da: Elektronik > Lyd > Sceneudstyr: In-ear-monitorsystemer; Scrims, gardiner og facader; Scenedæk og platforme; Scenegulvlommer og -kasser; Scene-monitorer; Stage snakes; Spær og monteringsisenkram; Trådløse modtagere; Trådløse sendere
sv: Elektronik > Ljud > Scenutrustning: In-ear-monitorsystem; Scenelement, skärmar och fasader; Scengolv och plattformar; Golvuttag och boxar för scen; Scenmonitorer; Scenslangar; Traverser och riggutrustning; Trådlösa mottagare; Trådlösa sändare
en: Electronics > Audio > Stage Equipment: In-Ear Monitor Systems; Scrims, Skirts & Facades; Stage Decks & Platforms; Stage Floor Pockets & Boxes; Stage Monitors; Stage Snakes; Trusses & Rigging Hardware; Wireless Receivers; Wireless Transmitters
bg-BG: Електроника > Aудио > Сценично оборудване: Системи за вътреушни минислушалки; Завеси, поли и фасади; Подиуми и платформи за сцена; Подови кутии за сцена; Сценични монитори; Сценични мултикор кабели; Ферми и текелаж за закачане; Безжични приемници; Безжични предаватели
it: Elettronica > Audio > Attrezzature da palco: Sistemi di monitoraggio in-ear; Teli scrim, gonne e facciate; Pedane e piattaforme da palco; Botole e cassette da pavimento per palco; Monitor da palco; Snake da palco (multicore); Tralicci e ferramenta di rigging; Ricevitori senza fili; Trasmettitori wireless
hr-HR: Elektronika > Audio > Oprema za pozornicu: In-ear nadzorni sustavi; Kazališni zastori; Kazališne platforme; Kazališne utičnice; Kazališni monitori; Kazališni multicore kabeli; Kazališne konstrukcije; Bežični prijemnici; Bežični odašiljači
es: Electrónica > Audio > Equipos para escenario: Sistemas de monitor in-ear; Telones, faldones y fachadas; Tarimas y plataformas de escenario; Cajas y tomas de piso de escenario; Monitores de escenario; Multipares de escenario; Estructuras truss y herrajes de aparejo; Receptores inalámbricos; Transmisores inalámbricos
zh-TW: 電子器材 > 音訊設備 > 舞台設備: 入耳式監聽系統; 舞台布景及門面; 舞台甲板及平台; 舞台埋地接線盒; 舞台監聽器; 舞台蛇形電纜; 桁架及吊裝硬體; 無線接收器; 無線傳送器